Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3719
County
board; contracts authorized.

The county board may contract
with any person, firm, association, or corporation to carry out its powers and duties under the
Nebraska Visitors Development Act.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1257;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 19.